District of Columbia statutes.
28:9-606

Time of default for agricultural lien.

For purposes of this part, a default occurs in connection with an agricultural lien at the time the secured party becomes entitled to enforce the lien in accordance with the statute under which it was created.

Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-201, § 101, 47 DCR 7576

1. Source. New.

2. Time of Default. Remedies under this Part become available upon the debtor’s “default.” See Section 9-601. This section explains when “default” occurs in the agricultural-lien context. It requires one to consult the enabling statute to determine when the lienholder is entitled to enforce the lien.